Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2934
Annual members' meetings.

(1) The members of the limited cooperative association shall meet annually as provided in the articles of organization or bylaws or at the direction of the board of directors not inconsistent with the articles of organization or bylaws.

(2) Annual members' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in the articles of organization or bylaws or by the board of directors in accordance with the articles of organization or bylaws.

(3) The board of directors shall report or cause to be reported at the annual members' meeting the business and financial condition as of the close of the most recent fiscal year.

(4) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws, the board of directors shall designate the presiding officer of the annual members' meeting.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 34.